title,selftext,subreddit
Holy Bullies and Headless Monsters: Anti-LGBTQ hate group giddy that Kavanaugh confirmed for SCOTUS,,gayrights
Court: Landlords Must Protect Tenants From Homophobic Harassment,,gayrights
Family Research Council already weaponizing Jeff Sessions' 'religious liberty' task force to target SPLC,,gayrights
"NYC Pride 2018: History of Pride, Coming Out, Gender Pronouns, &amp; Corporatization",,gayrights
The Vice Mayor of my town has slandered homosexuals in the newspaper. Please help us stand up to him!,"Hello everyone. I need your help, I mean my whole town really really needs your help.

The Vice Mayor of my town, Dixon California, went full tilt bigot recently and decided to publish an article in the town’s newspaper. In this article he called to make July  **""Straight Pride American Month""** and called gay men **""faries""** *(and yes everyone, the Vice Mayor did, in fact, misspell it)*. 

Now, I think this is abhorrent. The vast majority of Dixon thinks it’s abhorrent. However, city hall just wants to wait for it to blow over. The citizens of Dixon are already calling for a recall of the Vice Mayor, however, the Mayor and city council don’t want to go through the trouble of a recall election. They just want to wait until November so that *“nature can take its course”*.

Well, you know what, I don’t want nature to take its course. I feel that we shouldn’t sit back and treat the Vice Mayor like any other disgraced politician. The Vice Mayor used an LGBT slur *(and fucking misspelled)* in a column of a newspaper he co-owns. If the people of Dixon and the LGBT community don’t do something, what does that say about us? That we accept slur’s as normal? that we tolerate our elected officials abusing their power to belittle others? Most importantly, are we going to allow them to make us feel unwelcome in our own communities? I can’t do that, can you?

So I’m going to contact the Ted Hickman and give him a piece of my mind, and I would appreciate if some of you could join me. **It’s the god damned 4th of July, and I’m going to stand up for my community and our freedom**. 

The People of Dixon California have started a facebook page to gather support to recall the vice mayor. We would appreciate it if you could give us your support and maybe share it with anyone who might be interested: [https://www.facebook.com/Recall-Ted-Hickman-Vice-Mayor-of-Dixon-CA-353277151869181/](https://www.facebook.com/Recall-Ted-Hickman-Vice-Mayor-of-Dixon-CA-353277151869181/)

[Here is a link to Ted’s website as a city council member, You can find his contact info here ](http://www.ci.dixon.ca.us/Directory.aspx?EID=145)

[Here is a link to That’s Life, Ted’s news colom](http://www.tedhickman.com/), You can read the article for yourself. I don’t want to muckrake anymore than I already have, so I will let Ted’s words stand for themselves

[Here is a link to the independent voice](https://independentvoice.com/contact-us/), the paper that published Ted’s article. You can reach out to them and let them know what you think. 

Don’t just take my word for it. Here are two local news outlets in my area if you want to know more. 

[http://www.kcra.com/article/straight-pride-column-leads-to-recall-demands-of-dixon-vice-mayor/22028679](http://www.kcra.com/article/straight-pride-column-leads-to-recall-demands-of-dixon-vice-mayor/22028679)

[https://www.sacbee.com/news/local/article214127889.html](https://www.sacbee.com/news/local/article214127889.html)
",gayrights
A priest is in a city forum arguing against a pride parade,"""I say everyone should leave their personal business in their own homes, behind closed doors at night where it belongs.""

My response, ""Religion is personal too wouldn't you say?""

He says, ""Religion you can talk about on the street. Sexual behavior, or the suggestion of it, you really can't. Actually, I'm pretty sure it's against the law/city ordinance. Everything has a place and this is not it.""

How can I be classy and say,  he's wrong? And the parade is ok?",gayrights
"No One is Illegal: This Pride, I Fight for Roxana Hernandez",,gayrights
LGBTQ+ Cancer Screening Survey (Anonymous)," Hi everyone

I'm a medical student working in the Radiation Oncology department at Thomas Jefferson University in Philadelphia. Our team, led by Dr. Nicole Simone, is fighting to reduce barriers to quality health care outcomes in the LGBTQ+ community.

**At the moment, we're interested in investigating how barriers such as cost and stigmatization may cause patients to forgo or delay vital health care treatments or cancer screening guidelines.** In short, we want to better understand how equitable, fair results can be best obtained for those in the LGBTQ+ community.

\---

If you have a bit of time, we'd love for you to fill out the attached short survey!

[https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW](https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW)

**The survey is entirely confidential** and there is no identifiable material included in it.

\---

Thank you!",gayrights
Info about a relationship education program for male couples!,"Hey! My name is Arielle and I'm a queer researcher and relationship skills coach at Northwestern University. I want to give y'all some info about 2GETHER, a project we have going on for male couples.

2GETHER is a paid research study that involves a relationship education program-- where you and your partner can learn healthy relationship skills like communication, coping, and other ways to strengthen your relationship. We have a national online program and an in-person program for people who live in Chicago.

There will be follow-up surveys and free at-home STI testing before and after the 2GETHER program. Because we're a university, all data we collect is protected by IRB and federal regulations. If you and your partner are eligible to take part, you'll see a consent form, which has more info about your privacy rights.

Fun bonus: as a thank you for completing all parts of 2GETHER, each partner will receive $250!

Want to find out if you qualify, or learn more? Check out our eligibility screener: https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY

Even more info on our website: http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/

IRB #STU00202802, STU00202939
",gayrights
Egregious violation of privacy with an unhealthy heaping portion of homophobia and Heteronormative prejudice,,gayrights
CJEU rules on groundbreaking case for gay couple,,gayrights
The Prison-Like Public Hospital Systems Disproportionately Packed With Gay Men,,gayrights
LGBTQ+ Cancer Screening Survey (Anonymous)," Hi everyone

I'm a medical student working in the Radiation Oncology department at Thomas Jefferson University in Philadelphia. Our team, led by Dr. Nicole Simone, is fighting to reduce barriers to quality health care outcomes in the LGBTQ\+ community.

**At the moment, we're interested in investigating how barriers such as cost and stigmatization may cause patients to forgo or delay vital health care treatments or cancer screening guidelines.** In short, we want to better understand how equitable, fair results can be best obtained for those in the LGBTQ\+ community.

\-\-\-

If you have a bit of time, we'd love for you to fill out the attached short survey!

[https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW](https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW)

**The survey is entirely confidential** and there is no identifiable material included in it.

\-\-\-

Thank you!",gayrights
LGBT Suicidal Veteran Privacy Right Violations and Gay Slur,,gayrights
Conservative talk show host compares the ND GOP Secretary of State candidate's non-consensual sexual voyeurism (peeping) to the fact that the Dem candidate is openly gay.,,gayrights
"Gay Amtrak passenger brutally beaten and left trackside, comatose",,gayrights
"Official Government of Canada Petition to repeal blood ban against men who have sex with men in Canada, open until July 17th",,gayrights
Why Pride Parades are Still Important,,gayrights
Please Sign our Petition on Trans Rights in Louisiana Schools!,"Hi,

I am Tatjana Cotton, a Southwood senior posting here on behalf of my friend Kami Pham, who is being unfairly targetted by our school administration. Kami is a graduating senior who’s rights are being taken from him because he chooses to dress in a “feminine” way.



He chose to wear a wig and makeup for his senior photographs which were taken last summer, but only recently our school told him it was against dress code and violated the rules, and said that he will not be allowed to be in the graduation ceremony, senior wall, or yearbook as a result. Our principal claimed it was because used of previously established dress code rules, but none of which exist on the school, state, or parish level.



The petition hosted on change.org, and unfortunately, we only have around 40 days to get this unfair treatment adjusted before graduation on May 9th. We would appreciate any help you can give!

Linked below is our petition, and it includes contact information for our school and school board. 

Thanks!

https://www.change.org/p/southwood-high-school-stop-lgbt-discrimination-in-north-louisiana-schools?recruiter=798628543&amp;utm_source=share_petition&amp;utm_medium=facebook&amp;utm_campaign=share_for_starters_page",gayrights
Has anyone read This is an Uprising?,"I've just finished *This is an Uprising* by Mark Engler and Paul Engler, and I think it is an amazing resource.

Has anyone else read it? What do you think?",gayrights
Where to start.... Here is a video that explains all...,"I can't type everything out as it would take me a year. Here is a link to my youtube and what is happening. Share if you want, Ask questions if you wish and provide any feedback you will. I live in Utah and Gay Rights haven't really made it's way here yet so I feel like i'm being brushed off....

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Sj21L-jsM5Q&amp;feature=share",gayrights
Good Law | Bad Law #66 - Let them eat cake? The Supreme Court weighs free expression versus non discrimination W/ Rod Smolla,,gayrights
EDP445 goes on homophobic rant,,gayrights
level of gay rights activism (too) low?,"Hi guys,
I don't want to sound rude, but comparing the level of discimination against LGBT and comparing that to the level of activism in the LGBT community I don't understand why there isn't more activism? (I am talking about activism in Europe in particular, maybe America is different)

Can you help me figure that out? And also what are your ideas to increase activism and better work together to advance LGBT rights and wellbeing? Hope we are on the same boat here...cheers!",gayrights
IU study: Denying wedding cakes to gay couples not about religious freedom,,gayrights
Transgender people can join the military Jan. 1 after court strikes down Trump's request,,gayrights
Why Britney Spears May Be The Most Inspirational LGBT Icon Alive [Article],,gayrights
Aussies choose LOVE over Hate!,,gayrights
How Calling Kevin Spacey a Pedophile Hurts the Gay Community,,gayrights
In need of legal advice,"My kid and I have been harassed by a parent who doesn’t agree with my child’s sexuality. It’s none of their business, but they are making it their business. They have their  sights on my kid and a few others at my kids school. 
Any reference to legal aid that I can contact would be greatly appreciated. I am a long time reddit user, I just made a throwaway for protection purposes. TYSM",gayrights
Federal judge dismisses lawsuit by Minn. wedding videographers who sued to refuse same-sex customers,,gayrights
Help Us Build an Art Installation in NYC for Trans LifeLine in Protest of Trans Erasure,,gayrights
Any LGBTI Vloggers / Video Makers Here?,"Do you make LGBTI-themed vlogs on YouTube, Vidme, Vimeo or elsewhere online on a mainstream website? 

If so, please share and let's connect. ",gayrights
An interesting gaming interaction...,"So I was on the sub reddit, r/rocketleagueexchange and it's basically a place where you trade in game items. I offered this guy a trade but he didn't respond, then a day later he responds but I tell him I have already traded with someone else due to him taking to long. He then goes into a pointless rant about how I'm a time waster which was understandable but also said that since I wasted his time I was gay. I knew he meant this to be an insult but I wasn't offended, I tried to reason with him and he just went on and on about if you displease him you are gay. I found this incredibly stupid so I also tried to tell him that it makes no sense. 
I have currently given up on this man, there is no hope for him and I tried my best to sort of fix him. 
And no, I am not gay but I believe that every person in the world should feel safe and equal. This man is preventing this goal.

(Sorry if this post doesn't fit here but I really wanted to post this somewhere and this sub reddit seemed fitting)",gayrights
Us Supreme Court rules in favour of lesbian couple adopting - Bright Side Journal,,gayrights
5-4,,gayrights
The Bathroom Bans,,gayrights
Looking for help where to find info and/or consultation for immigration into the USA for a gay couple. Any info on fiance/spouse visas into the USA?,"Hi! I am a US citizen and my SO is from Japan. We have been together for a long time (7-8 years) and I actually came all the way to Japan and made a career here so we could be together.

Japan is stable for us, and is a nice, safe country here. And while there isn't much of an *anti* gay sentiment here, there are no rights. Things are okay for us here in Japan now, but we feel like Japan might be a bad place for us to be when we start getting sick and old. (we are still young in our 30s now) Also, Japan has a pretty crappy stress workplace culture that we would like to get away from.

Years ago, the idea of me being able to take my SO to the US with me seemed like a distant fantasy, but now it seems like since the supreme court ruling of 2015, it seems like it should be possible.

But I don't want to risk us getting spit up as a family or having something bad like that happen if it turns out there is no president for immigration rights for married/engaged same-sex couples. 

I have heard of same-sex international couples getting married in the USA where the non-US citizen already had some sort of visa or green card, but I have not heard of someone actually bringing a partner/spouse into the country.

I am desperate for information or an introduction to an immigration lawyer with experience with same-sex couples. I am willing to pay for a paid consultation if the lawyer really has relevant experience. 

Any advice, information, relevant stories, referrals, etc. would be grateful!!",gayrights
"Anonymous survey for individuals ages 12-20 -- $250 Visa gift card grand prize -- your responses help the nonprofit org Brave Trails, a camp for LGBTQ+ youth. Thank you and Happy Pride!",,gayrights
An insightful (imo under appreciated) YouTuber shares his thoughts on LGBTQI+,,gayrights
Church of Scotland edging towards gay marriage,,gayrights
Bowling for Columbine (2002) - Matt Stone on High School Scene (6/11) | ...,,gayrights
Grants Pass Youth Center Turned Down Major Donation From Portland Gay Men's Chorus,,gayrights
Chechens tell of prison beatings and electric shocks in anti-gay purge: ‘They called us animals’,,gayrights
Putin wants to ban pictures of him being depicted as a 'gay clown',,gayrights
Gay rights organizations hail court ruling as “game changer”,,gayrights
Netflix adds to its catalog a poor quality movie that promotes violence against LGBT people. People in Latin America created petition to remove it on change.org,,gayrights
The Islamic hatred of Gays and Lesbians,,gayrights
Transgender discrimination at Rite Aid Pharmacy,"So I have a bit of a story but I will make it as short as possible. I am a Transgender individual, and regardless of how you feel about that, I finally got medical confirmation of a miscommunication between my brain and my body, and was able to get my testosterone and syringe prescriptions. This is medically confirmed so please save personal comments on the issue for yourself as I really am seeking help here (this is copied and posted for many subs so I am not so worried about negativity on this sub).

When I went into Rite Aid to submit my prescription, and an individual (description of the individual only included because it is relevant, the religious affiliation itself isn't, but the fact that it interfered with her job is) wearing a sheer white bandana and a jean skirt (certainly a christian sect, again nothing negative, many christians do their job well without discrimination) helped me.
She refused to counsel me on my medication or to tell me if they had called my insurance to get my testosterone authorized (something they normally do automatically). She refused to respond when asked for counseling on the syringes, checked the box FOR ME that said I did not wish to be counseled, exactly after I asked to be counseled. 

I submitted a report to their ethics department the next day, and returned and asked a supervisor to help me get the necessary information. I was able to get a print out telling me exactly what to do in order to authorize my medication, at the same time I picked up my syringes (which I also wasn't counseled on) and they were the wrong ones!

Once my insurance authorized my medication I had to call Rite Aid again to get them to fill it (again something normally done automatically when you sign the correct paperwork to authorize direct fill without contacting me)

When I finally was able to get my testosterone the same employee tried to help me, so she obviously has not been spoken to or reprimanded at all. I politely asked for another employee, which she then walked away and DIDN'T tell anyone else I needed help, the supervisor had to find someone.

I finally found someone to get me the right syringes. I spent extra money on them, and all of this crap delayed my first shot for a whole week. This is a big deal to me as the hormone miscommunication causes complications that have made me suffer from chronic pain my whole life. I found some legal help, but I want it to be known that this is happening. If anyone out here has experienced ANY form of discrimination from any Rite Aid Pharmacy please PM me.

I am trying to gather similar accounts as this may soon become a much larger case being that their ethics code covers almost nothing on employee customer interactions besides following HIPA laws. I should also note that the first report I filed with the ethics department was closed without comment, without contact with me, and without any form of apology. They refused to take my personal information, and upon filing another report restating the incident as well as the newly discovered involvement with not just the initial employee but the manager who swept the report under the rug and refused to reprimand the initial employee. That report has somehow mysteriously disappeared. 
This is a Rite Aid in Bellingham, Washington, but discrimination searches about Rite Aid are quite numerous throughout the US with settlements in the millions with very little reform in ethics policy.

If you would like to see this change, for women getting contraception, birth control, plan b,  trans people, or anyone with any sort of sensitive medication please let me know. We all deserve to be treated equally and with respect, despite what medications you are receiving. 

I believe that this company behaves this way because one of their main shareholders to my understanding is the Sisters of St. Francis who are actively also working to prevent the sale of many products in stores they are shareholders in. It appears they buy stock purely for this purpose. If you know of anywhere I can post this in order to reach out to more people who may have had similar experience please comment or PM.

I would like to be clear as someone already said this, this is not just an employee being rude, this is an employee directly violating HIPA laws, purposefully delaying information and medication by any means possible and treating customers differently purely based on her religious stance. 

I am putting this out here so that individuals who are at risk of discrimination are aware, and of course I plan on using a different pharmacy from now on. Please share this and please let me know of more visible areas to post this. 
p.s. to anyone wanting to shit on me for having the state pay for my transition, don't assume. I have private insurance and would gladly pay out of pocket if I didn't have it.",gayrights
"If you honestly think that being gay is a sin according to the Bible, then you really need to watch these videos!","I'm sharing these videos because I'm a cisgender Christian woman and I am wholeheartedly affirming and fully supportive to ALL LGBTQ+ people in and outside the Church as I don't believe that being gay, transgender, lesbian, bisexual or anything else is a sin AT ALL because there is a mountain full of evidence to prove that homosexuality (in this case because these are what the videos are about) is NOT a sin in ANY way and you can most definitely be gay and be a Christian!

[What Does The Bible Really Say About Being Gay?] (https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=leIcLYj3I3U)

[God And The Gay Christian: The Biblical Case On Support Of Same Sex Relationships] (https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=gmp6lLct-fQ)

[Homosexuality Is NOT a Sin](https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=Dyl7jWk-cuU) - and [this is the follow up video] (https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=mEmDkFGHCMY)

[Homosexuality and why it is NOT a sin] (https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=qBYpEKmW3ig)

[The Gay Debate: Homosexuality And The Bible] (https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=ezQjNJUSraY)

[7 Bible Quotes Supporting Homosexuality] (https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=kinSS1P1T4Y)",gayrights
[Survey] Share your Experiences as a Bisexual Mom,"https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/bisexualresearch

Hello my name is Meghan Cromie, a  bisexual student at New College of Florida. I am conducting research on the experiences of bisexual mothers and I am inviting you to help. Click the link below to be taken to a survey if you are over 18 years old and have given birth, or had a partner who has given birth. The survey should take approximately 15-20 minutes.

If you are friends with any other bisexual moms, feel free to share this link with them.

Thank you for your time, and for helping conduct needed research!
",gayrights
Anti-Gay pastors' speeches Deleted by YouTube,,gayrights
Don't believe Trump's spin. The War against same-sex marriage is just getting started,,gayrights
Gay Marriage Trump Won't Stop Us,,gayrights
Immigration order bars entry to anyone who oppresses others for sexual orientation. Isn't this a big deal?,,gayrights
A letter to all 'well meaning' people who think we don't need Pride Marches or to talk about homosexuality at all!,,gayrights
Gayrights stream link anyone ?, Need link,gayrights
"Steve Wynn supports hate, homophobia, etc?",,gayrights
[survey] Sexual Minority Women &amp; the LGBTQ+ Community,"My name is Shelby and I’m a Psychology and Gender Studies undergraduate student. I’m conducting a brief survey on sexual minority women, gender presentation, and the LGBTQ community for my thesis research and would love your participation. I am looking for sexual minority women above the age of 18. Your participation should take about 10 minutes and will enable you to provide your voice in research that directly impacts your community. 

Here is the link to the survey: 
https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/D2FSQY5

If you have any questions, contact me at shelby.statham13@ncf.edu. 

Thank you!",gayrights
Standing up for what's right,"I have a story that I am very passionate about that is going on in my life right now and I would like some feedback/ motivation. Around last week my friend sent me a screenshot of a tweet some girl posted that goes to my school, the tweet read ""the gay community, are some of the most ignorant people in the world. They don't accept your beliefs, but you're supposed to accept yours🤔"" now I had seen that one of my friends replied to her saying ""I don't think they're the ignorant ones"" and I believe she was right. Like First of all, the tweet itself barely made sense, I read it 4 times to make sure I understood what she was saying, and second of all, what's the need to post that??? And then she got mad that people were responding, and let me tell you, a lot of people responded, me included, now I was the 2nd or 3rd person to respond to her so it's not like I was one of the people who just jumped in because there was drama (which I don't think anyone did, everyone who said something said it because she needed to be stood up to) but anyways I said to her ""not know that a way of life, and a belief are substantially different is ignorant"" now we went back and forth a couple times, nothing bad, no one one got nasty or anything, but she told me that ""I'm friends w/ people like that. Don't confuse it with acceptance of sin. You can't convince me you weren't born an abomination unto god"" now at this point I was just hoping she'd block me, I couldn't deal with the stupidity anymore. More and more people were tweeting at her, and then someone posted a screenshot of the girl saying that she likes gay porn ( guy on guy) now at this point I was out of the discussion, I saw the screenshot, and it had a bunch of responses, people thought it was hilarious, and honestly it kinda was, like it's ironic, she constantly contradicted herself over and over, and it's not like this is her first time posting something homophobic, it's just the first time that 1/2 the sophomore girls said something to her. And the next couple days, every sophomore (or anyone involved) who said something about the situation, got called down to the office. The office told them not to get involved next time. Now I haven't gotten called down yet but I suspect I will tomorrow. My problem with this is that I'm not sorry, which is what they want us to be. And I'm gonna do it again, which is what they don't want us to do. Wanna know why? Because I grew up being told by parents, relatives, faith, friends, myself, MY SCHOOL, to stand up for what I believe in. Know how many bullying discussions my schools have taught us, and how many times I've heard ""don't be a bystander"" and when that time comes, they shut us down?? Please tell me how that makes sense- it's not like this was an online bullying situation- did a select few take it a little too far, yes, but it's 2017 and if we are going to let a little thing like sexuality limit us to who we accept into our life and who we don't, then it's you who are the sinner. And so if I do get called down to the office, I will express my freedom of speech, once again, and feel no guilt.",gayrights
"Trump will roll back Obama’s LGBT rights protections, Mike Pence confirms",,gayrights
"Spread the word.... this year, a vote for Republican is a vote for: -hate -homophobia -a step back for EQUALITY",,gayrights
My high school is anti gay?,,gayrights
Queer Through the Years: A timeline of gay rights,,gayrights
Stop Playing The Victim!,,gayrights
[Survey] I'm looking for LGBTQ participants for a study on discrimination experiences (or lack thereof),,gayrights
First Gay Pride in Ukraine protected by 6 000 policemen,,gayrights
"Sam Harris discusses Islam, Orlando and the reaction from Trump, Clinton and Obama. Attack on gay nightclub, 50 killed, many seriously wounded.",,gayrights
Clay Aiken makes a chilling point about how Florida fails LGBTQ people,,gayrights
PTSD Meltdown After Being Stalked by Transphobic Gay Hater Day 1 Part 2,,gayrights
United States Government says L.A. Gay Couple’s 1975 Marriage is Valid - The Pride L.A.,,gayrights
Why Is Lebanon Still Using Colonial-Era Laws to Persecute LGBTQ Citizens?,,gayrights
Gay Choir 'Humiliated' During San Diego Padres Game,,gayrights
"Remember the Christian bakery who wouldn't bake cake for LGBT couples? Well this faithful Mormon-owned bakery not only bakes the cake, they hosted a lesbian wedding in their store.",,gayrights
Colombia legalises gay marriage,,gayrights
Hey guys! Euro gays I want your opinion!,"Hey all,

I'm French and currently working on a research project on the **perception by EU LGBT of their rights situation in their country**. 

Every year, [The Rainbow Index](http://www.ilga-europe.org/resources/rainbow-europe/2015) publishes a report which ranks each EU country based on their handling of LGBT rights and issues. I want to find out whether these results reflect reality. I would love it if you could help me do that.

If you live in **any European country** and you're interested in giving me a hand (hehe) for this project, here are questions you should answer (you can PM me your answers if you'd rather):

You can access the [survey here](https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/TNKPC8S)

* 1- How do you **perceive** the state of LGBT rights in your country? (Let me know how you feel on a daily basis at home and **where you are from**)

* 2- How do you **reach this perception**? (What means do you use: personal experiences, social media, news, organisations...)

* 3- Are you **familiar with** the Rainbow Index?

If there is anything else you'd like to add, please feel free to do so! 

A million thanks and hoping to hear from all of you soon! Don't hesitate to ask questions.

*Smooches*",gayrights
The other day I was talking about anti-gay legislation and figured out that being gay isn't against the bible and that Gays can go to heaven.,,gayrights
Senator calls PayPal a PedoPal but is really just a hater,,gayrights
Please join me by adding your voice to support LGBTQ student rights in Michigan.,,gayrights
National Union of Students tells LGBT societies to abolish gay men’s reps because ‘they don’t face oppression’,"http://www.pinknews.co.uk/2016/03/22/nus-tells-lgbt-societies-to-abolish-gay-mens-reps-because-they-dont-face-oppression/

The motion passed.",gayrights
Botswana government loses battle to ban gay group,,gayrights
[Nearly 9/10 Studies on Relationships Exclude GSM - We Want to Change This!] ~~Seeking Individuals in ALL Relationships For Online Study On Sexual Problems and Sexual Well-Being~~ [Master's Thesis Project],"I am a Master's student in Clinical Psychology at Queen's University, and my passion is in conducting inclusive sex research and making sure that LGB&amp;T voices are heard in research. I am currently completing my master's thesis that looks at how different couple constellations negotiate and navigate sexual problems. We are currently recruiting participants in intimate romantic relationships who have been dating a minimum of three months for an online study on sexual problems and sexual well-being. We are looking for participants in ALL relationships with any level of sexual satisfaction, with or without sexual problems or concerns. We greatly appreciate everyone who is able to participate and/or able to help us spread the word. Thanks you for your help in conducting inclusive sex research!
*****To participate visit: https://surveys.psyc.queensu.ca/SWBR.aspx ~Note: There is also a 'save and exit' button in the survey if you would prefer to complete it over multiple sittings.",gayrights
Homophobia In The Modern World,,gayrights
I have a confession. Im totally gay. - Journal Comments,,gayrights
I just got deferred from a blood drive. Does this go against the FDA's lift of the MSM ban?,"First time posting here. (Private account because I'm in the closet) but was wondering if there was anything to do about my recent deferral from donating blood to the Central Blood Bank. I have not had any sexual contact with men for several years now and thought I'd donate blood since the ban was released back in December. However I find myself sitting next to a woman saying ""sorry this is an automatic deferral...have a nice day."" Shocked, I got up and left....is this right?",gayrights
"""Confusing"" Charges Dropped Against Six Of Seven Rentboy Escort Site Workers",,gayrights
"Italy postpones gay civil unions voting, adoption rights at risk",,gayrights
Rentboy CEO Indicted As Coworkers' Fates Remain Up In The Air,,gayrights
"Driving while gay? Missouri cops soon might be recording the ""perceived"" sexual orientation of drivers they ticket.",,gayrights
"Malawi Gay Man Comes Out, Tells Gov’t: Either Kill Us or Give Us Rights",,gayrights
"I was just in a very long Facebook debate, and I'd be interested in anyone who is familiar with this argument to help me","Basically the guy kept going back to something called ""deviant behavior"". Not like devil, but like deviation. Best I can find is along his lines is something called structural functionalism. But it seems to act against him. Any one else familiar with it that might have better criticism than I was able to come up with off the cuff?",gayrights
Salt Lake City elects first openly gay mayor amid setbacks to LGBT community,,gayrights
Ireland Celebrates 1st Gay Marriages After May Referendum,,gayrights
How to roll back global homophobia through mutual respect,,gayrights
Cyprus: Adoption definitely off the table for civil partnerships,,gayrights
Global society has no reason to restrict the freedom to love,,gayrights
GAY MEN IN THE UK ARE BANNED FROM GIVING BLOOD,,gayrights
Mike Pence still hoping to preserve the right to discriminate against LGBT Americans,,gayrights
Pope tries imposing his religion over US supreme court decision,,gayrights
"Does not a lesbian have a fallopian tube? Am I not human, and [am] I not somebody who could be a lovely, wonderful mother?",,gayrights
Kim Davis: The Un-American Video,,gayrights
Minnesota Cub Scout pack's charter threatened after BSA accepts gay leaders,,gayrights
What Does it Mean to be Gay in the Midwest? This Artist is Trying to Find Out,,gayrights
"Watch ""MY COMING OUT VIDEO!"" on YouTube",,gayrights
GOP Presidential Hopefuls and the Constitution,,gayrights
"Six Republican presidential candidates back defiance of gay marriage ruling: ""What is involved here is an effort to legitimize government-imposed bigotry and overturn constitutional principles.""",,gayrights
Petition: Stop Federal prosecution of rentboy.com,,gayrights
"Same-sex couple in Kentucky denied marriage license by county clerk for second time, despite federal judge orders",,gayrights
European Court urges Italy (and Europe) to legally recognize same-sex partnerships,,gayrights
Ethiopian LGBT activist banned by Facebook under real name policy,,gayrights
Great guy from my midwest hometown gets canned from his job as a pastor for not condemning the supreme court ruling.,,gayrights
"TX Attorney General, Ken Paxton fights a losing battle against the SCOTUS marriage equality ruling.",,gayrights
Infographic Response to SCOTUS Marriage Ruling,,gayrights
U-Haul still involved with anti-gay Tennessee hardware store,"As far as I can tell, the Amyx Hardware, the Tennessee hardware store that put up a ""no gays allowed"" sign (http://www.wbir.com/story/news/local/claiborne-hancock-grainger-union/2015/06/30/store-puts-up-no-gays-allowed-sign-after-same-sex-marriage-ruling/29497621/), is still renting U-Haul trucks (http://amyxhardware.com/). Or if they don't, they're infringing on U-Haul's trademark. Either way, it seems to me U-Haul has some disassociating to do. Quickly. ",gayrights
THAT GUY WHO THINKS GAYS ARE NOT PURE BUT ITS OK WE GOTTA LOVE THE SINNERS AND HELP THEM,,gayrights
The Gay Debate: The Bible and Homosexuality,,gayrights
marriage equality supreme court decision,,gayrights
"[Gay Rights] This was written by my gay Uncle concerning a lot of "" legal "" disagreements about SCOTUS. If you have a moment, please read it, it would mean a lot to him and me. It's pretty amazing.","I am neither a lawyer nor a constitutional scholar, but I do have an opinion, and my mind will not let me rest until I express it.

I have said nothing about the SCOTUS decision yet simply because I have difficulty processing new developments quickly, particularly when they are as emotionally and politically charged as this.  While I am certainly pleased with the decision, I find it impossible to be too overjoyed about it.  Yes, it is most definitely a major step forward, but if the views expressed by the opposition are any indication, there is still a good way to go.  Therefore, I will reserve final personal judgment on the whole of the long-term effect and avoid any hyperbolic statements.

I usually take a rather dim and jaded view of government and business in general because in spite of being dependent on the public for their very existence, they are often at odds with what the people want due to political and/or financial reasons.  They lag behind until they see the how things play out a bit - as well as trying to figure out how they can exploit and capitalize on it - before jumping on the bandwagon as self-styled heroes and declaring that they have always been forward-thinking entities when reality and history clearly show the opposite.

Did love win?  Perhaps in terms of the public emotional state, but I think what actually won in the legal arena was a much more mundane and pragmatic view of the political and economic landscape we've moved into.  Governments and big business are rarely leaders in social change; they are far more often the reasons that such change is necessary.  Two-thirds of the states - enough to ratify a Constitutional amendment, by the way - approved the idea of marriage equality before the government stepped in as the ""hero"".  Many large companies did give their support earlier on, but most of them are headquartered in states where marriage equality had already been decided, so for them it was simply a matter of being forced to follow the laws in their respective states but quickly understanding the economic and public relations/marketing impact of doing so and putting a positive spin on it.

A perfect example of this is that in 2008 Presidential Candidate Obama said ""I believe marriage is between a man and a woman. I am not in favor of gay marriage.""  Sounds hypocritical compared to now, right?  By strict appearance, yes, but remember where we were in 2008.  It would have been politically ruinous for him to have given even slight support back then since only three states had struck down same-sex marriage bans before the November 2008 elections.  Fast forward to 2012 when it was becoming clear where things were headed judging by the number of states attempting to follow the lead of those three, and we have Mr. Obama saying that his views on the issue were ""evolving"".  Of course they were.  He had an election to win, and by claiming that such an evolution might be in progress while not actually expressing clear support, he could effectively court all stripes of the political spectrum.  And of course, now that he can't run again, it doesn't matter, so he fully supports it.  Political expediency much?

Having said all that, most people who know me are already aware of my probably negative and pessimistic view of government and business, and I have no intention using this forum to foist that rhetoric on anyone else any further.  I do, however, want to address a few of the comments I've seen in various places from a Constitutional perspective.

Chief Justice Roberts commented in his dissent that this decision had “nothing to do with the Constitution”.  In my not-so-humble opinion, I’ll only say that he’s full of shit.  It had everything to do with the Constitution and the rule of law, and this is why.

If one understands of the purpose of a constitutional federal republic (which the United States ostensibly is), the arguments of those who disagree with the SCOTUS decision – even those members of the SCOTUS minority – fall flat. When the various states joined the union over the last two and a quarter centuries, they agreed to subject themselves to the federalist view, i.e., that the federal Constitution would be the supreme law of the land and that all states must subject themselves and their own laws to it.  While there may be a few exceptions that I'm not aware of (I’ll admit that I haven't checked on this part all that extensively), it’s my understanding that most states incorporate the US Constitution into their own by reference.  In doing so, the states must necessarily adopt the same restrictions on passing laws for their respective citizens as those which are imposed on the federal government.  This allows a single document to reign supreme and not, as in other countries, have a cobbled together collection of laws passed at disparate times that have to be reconciled with each other through compromise.

The 10th Amendment says, ""The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to the people.""  If one goes strictly by the language, that means simply that if the Constitution doesn't say anything about an issue, then the states have the right to pass laws regulating whatever it is.  The unspoken caveat here, however, is that any such laws must comply with the limitations imposed elsewhere within that document.  It is reasonable, then, that the position that the states have the right under the 10th Amendment to regulate marriage is a valid one, provided that attempts at said regulation do not otherwise violate the restrictions set forth in the main document and/or other amendments.

While the current case was predicated on the restriction of rights afforded under the equal protection clause of 14th Amendment, the case was essentially about a state not recognizing a marriage performed in another state.  I believe a strong argument for the cause could and should also have been made for Article 4, Section 1 of the main document, to wit: ""Full Faith and Credit shall be given in each State to the public Acts, Records, and judicial Proceedings of every other State.""  If one argues that the 10th Amendment allows each state the right to regulate marriage within its own jurisdiction, that argument must be tempered by A4/S1, which explicitly says that every state must honor and respect the laws and judicial decisions of every other state, the implication being that they must do so even if those laws/decisions conflict with the laws within the state in question. In other words, Mississippi doesn't have to allow marriage equality under the 10th Amendment, but if a same-sex couple is visiting there from California, under A4/S1 Mississippi must recognize the marriage as being as valid as it is in California with all of the rights and privileges pertaining thereto, regardless of its own laws restricting marriage among its own citizens to heterosexual couples.

My reasoning for this is that throughout history, marriage has been little more than a legal contract between two parties (or more, in the case of the many wives of various kings, most notably King David) that was created and entered into for the purposes of forming alliances and ensuring the support of both parties for the continued survival, posterity, and prosperity of both.  As a legal arrangement, it can and should be subject to regulation in order to protect all parties involved in the contract.  The Full Faith and Credit Clause covers legal contracts (public Acts and judicial Proceedings), and therefore states must comply with it, the 10th Amendment notwithstanding.

The final argument that I will make is that the 1st Amendment explicitly prohibits the government, specifically Congress, from passing laws that establish a government-supported religion in any form, either specifically or by effect.  By joining the union and by incorporating the US Constitution into their own by reference the states have voluntarily subjected themselves, their laws, and their citizenry to the supremacy of the Constitution, state legislatures and the populace (meaning public initiatives as Prop 8 was in California) are thereby also prohibited from enacting laws that have the same effect.

Given who the opposition is in this case, it is fairly obvious that those who oppose it do so on religious grounds.  It’s also pretty easy to uncover the motives of those who try to write such laws, since they are usually pretty vocal about their reasoning.  In every case I’ve ever seen, such laws or restrictions have been directly or indirectly religiously based, regardless of their attempts to couch them in more legalistic verbiage.  As stated above, I agree that states do have the right to regulate things not specifically mentioned in the Constitution, but they may not violate any part of the Constitution or its amendments in doing so.  In addition, while religion has somewhat successfully co-opted marriage and claimed it as its own institution, the fact remains that marriage is simply a legal contract, the existence and use of which predates religion, and therefore has nothing to do with anything ordained by any god.

Now, there are those who would argue that they 1st Amendment also says that Congress – and by extension, the state legislatures – cannot pass laws that prohibit the free exercise of their religion, and that being forced to recognize marriages between non-heterosexual couples violates their right to freely exercise their religious practice of discriminating against people they don’t like.  This is not what happened.  There is no law on any book that says anyone anywhere cannot continue to believe whatever fairy-tale drivel they choose to believe, nor that they cannot continue to practice discrimination in their churches if they want to.  The 1st Amendment also says that the government cannot legally silence them, and no government has attempted to do so.  They can still spout their crap if they want to, and no law is trying to stop them.

They need to remember, however, their own rhetoric about this decision: that actions and words have consequences, and while no law can prevent them from saying whatever they like in a public forum, there is also no law that will prevent others from countering their arguments, refusing to do business with them, or attending their hate-fest church services.",gayrights
Ignorance. Teen slams equality and same sex marriage.,,gayrights
Can you guys help me out with a social experiment by filling out this Survey,,gayrights
Where Europe stands on gay marriage and civil unions,,gayrights
Homophobes aren't as bad as I thought they'd be.,"So. I was arguing (it wasn't really arguing, it was me using arguments and him screaming ""faggot"" at me for 15 minutes straight) with a homophobe about gay and trans rights. I just asked him ""What should being gay be illegal"" and he said ""I think it's disgusting"" and I replied ""I think peas are disgusting but we're not making that illegal, are we"" and he just laughed and said that I was not as bad as he thought I was.


We discovered we have similar interests, so we kinda became friends. He still doesn't accept me for who I am, but he's taking big steps and we're getting there!",gayrights
"The Brazilian House of Representatives is running a poll asking if we agree with the the definition of ""family"" as the union of a man and a woman exclusively. This poll is really important for future social policies for the LGBT community. Please access and vote ""Não"" (No).",,gayrights
Caitlyn Jenner Broke the Internet-The Comment Section Broke my Heart,,gayrights
Russian gay activists detained after unsanctioned LGBT rights rally in Moscow (xpost from r/gay),,gayrights
It takes a whole teenager to raise a town (xpost from r/gay),,gayrights
'Gay cake' row: Judge rules against Ashers bakery - BBC News,,gayrights
Cuba gay pride calls for same-sex-marriage to become legal,,gayrights
More Americans are comfortable with a gay Presidential candidate than ith an evangelical one,,gayrights
Is Turkey ready to elect its first openly gay lawmaker ?,,gayrights
"I'm being discriminated against because I'm gay, what can I do?","I work as a counselor at a religious organization. Recently I complained because of a consistent pattern of abuse I've received by my manager since I've come out there. I should mention the organization works under federal funding, so it can't discriminate against me based on sexual orientation, however they have ignored my complaints about this manager and when I have complained they have had me meet with upper management so that they could explain to me how it was actually my fault and not hers. My last complaint resulted in them setting up a meeting, leading me to believe it was a meeting to finally resolve my issues, but instead they created a bunch of fictitious incidents in order to put me on a disciplinary track. They gave me 90 days to resolve the issues, but in the adendum it states they will still fire me if I have any other issues. I have never had a complaint from a client until after I made this last complaint regarding my manager, in fact I have been one of the favorite counselors. Just a month ago my manager stated she was happy to have me as a counselor. Overnight I went from being a great employee to a pariah. I really don't know what to do. Can anyone point me in the right direction regarding who I can talk to so I don't get fired?",gayrights
Give your support for a gay marriage referendum in Northern Ireland (x-post from r/northernireland),,gayrights
The ‘Beauty’ of Russian Homophobia · Global Voices,,gayrights
"Susie Duncan Sexton's Blog - Enough already. #Indiana, simmer down.",,gayrights
Support for same-sex marriage in every state,,gayrights
NUI Maynooth Students Union Raise Pride Flag Despite Anti-Equality Message,,gayrights
Easy Evidence of WHY the Indiana Religious Restoration Bill is 100% Anti-Gay and Aimed DIRECTLY at gay people! See the proof!,,gayrights
lol u r gay,,gayrights
With openly gay leader New York defies Boy Scout ban,,gayrights
Arnold Schawrzenegger furious over GOP support for Indiana 'religious freedom' law: How can you lose with Conan on your side,,gayrights
Fargo Fourm calls out House members who voted against gay rights bill,,gayrights
"This is from my hometown, approximately 1 mile away from Memories Pizza. Not everybody in Indiana is a homophobe.",,gayrights
Why Roxane Gay Was Wrong About Mitt Romney and Indiana’s Homophobic Law and Why It Matters,,gayrights
Indiana Religious Freedom Law Causes Wilco To Cancel Show,,gayrights
Gay refugees from ISIS,,gayrights
Civil rights bill a top priority for LGBT voters poll says,,gayrights
China: Gay marriage advocates ask legislators to present their proposals at the two sessions,,gayrights
Former SMU RB and ESPN Analyst Craig James Blames Gay Athletes in the Locker Room on Satan | FatManWriting,,gayrights
Psychology Today refuses to remove listings for gay-conversion therapists,,gayrights
Federal Judge overturns Nebraska gay marriage ban,,gayrights
A Step backwards: Texas Supreme Court issues order prohibiting judges from issuing same-sex marriage licences,,gayrights
Texas same-sex couple marries despite state ban on gay marriage,,gayrights
New Jersey Judge rules ex-gay conversion 'therapy' is consumer fraud,,gayrights
Are trans or gay people more accepted in American society?,,gayrights
‘Modern Brides &amp; Modern Grooms’: How Same-Sex Marriage Has Opened Doors for All of Us,,gayrights
Chile's LGBT movement wins historical victory with approval of civil unions,,gayrights
Be The Change:gay rights,,gayrights
Alabama’s Sanctity laws harms the children of same-sex couples for the same reasons that the Supreme Court found that the Defense of Marriage Act harmed the children of same-sex couples.”,,gayrights
An Oklahoma legislator's over the top anti-gay campaign,,gayrights
Federal judge shuts down Alabama's gay marriage ban,,gayrights
America is ready for gay professional athletes: Poll,,gayrights
Supreme Court to take up gay marriage issue,,gayrights
It's Finally Official - Pope Francis Demotes Highest-Ranking US Cardinal Over LGBT Issues,,gayrights
Sexual orientation and income,,gayrights
Gay Chinese man wins compensation in country's first 'Conversion Lawsuit',,gayrights
Beaten for being gay in Russia,,gayrights
Gay progress since 2000,,gayrights
Beaten by his church for being gay,,gayrights
help RVA,"This is happening and we want to shut it down. we think the billboard service needs to be accountable  https://www.facebook.com/LamarRichmondVA?fref=nf


 http://www.nbc12.com/story/27625900/gay-rights-supporters-to-create-own-richmond-billboard",gayrights
The 5 Worst States for LGBT People in the USA.,,gayrights
Finnish Parliament approves same-sex marriage,,gayrights
I wrote an article for my college's newspaper about gay men's deferral from donating blood. It got picked up by a major news publication. I'm very proud of it.,,gayrights
Appeals Court Upholds Gay Marriage Bans in Four States,,gayrights
"Russian politician says openly gay Apple CEO, Tim Cook, should be banned from the country, fearing that Cook would encourage spread of Aids, Gonorrhea and, even, Ebola in Russia.",,gayrights
I can finally get married! (Arizona),,gayrights
Gay Marriage Now Legal in 29 States. My first blog post just got published in elephant journal. Feel free to share or tweet it if you like it.,,gayrights
"Chad Michael - ""Dear American Youth Pastor""(A poem about gay youth in the church)",,gayrights
Northeastern Oklahoma Court Clerk offices await confirmation before issuing same-sex marriage licenses,,gayrights
"Taco John's Called Me a ""GAYTARD""",,gayrights
Question about Harvey Milk's relationship to Jim Jones and the People's Temple," I just found out about his relationship with them, and it took me off guard. While I know that he was not the only politician to be friends with Jones pre-massacre (I believe even President Jimmy Carter was at least acquainted with him), I read that Milk requested his ashes be mixed with kool-aid along with bubble bath (the latter signifying his sexuality). The massacre was only 9 days before Milk's assassination.  Was this just in solidarity of the victims? 

So my question is: Is there any record of Milk addressing the massacre in that week before his death? Is it known if he ever publicly recanted his support for Jones and the People's Temple?",gayrights
Religious Satire Explained and Message to Trans people and LGBT teens,,gayrights
Federal Judge Martin Feldman Says Gay Marriage Is the Gateway Drug to Incest and Polygamy,,gayrights
Isnt Utah the greatest?,"So today I was in English class and the teacher was giving a lecture on William Shakespear. He brought up the fact that he often wrote love poems to a rich Baron and it was rumored that they were partners.  Of course living in utah, every guy in there was like ""Ewe!! what the fuck?!"" ""That must be why hes so good at writing! cuz hes secretly gay!!"" And i couldnt believe the shit that i was hearing so i turned around and said ""Why the fuck do you care? Why does it matter if he was heterosexual homosexual or bisexual?! He is more famous and loved than any of us will ever be!"" And the teacher looked at me and said "" Please discuss your opinion outside young man!"" and i looked at her and said ""no i get it, you can express your opinion in the class room if everyone else agrees with it right?"" ""makes a shit load of sense."" and thats how i got sent home from school. :)",gayrights
Rogue's Gallery : United States Of America,,gayrights
Christians Discriminating Against Gay People SUCK!,,gayrights
The Different Layers of the Closet,,gayrights
"Obama's day: LGBT executive order, Medal of Honor",,gayrights
"PA HS Principal cancels musical, says homosexuality ""has no place"" in the community",,gayrights
Kentucky Baptist Church Agrees To Hold Its First Same-Sex Wedding,,gayrights
"Matthew Vines, the author of ""God and the Gay Christian,"" a book that attempts to make the Biblical case for same-sex marriage. He also founded an organization called The Reformation Project that trains Christians to support LGBT people.",,gayrights
Advice on dealing with a homophobic teacher?,"My brother is gay and like many gay people he has gay friends. Recently one of my brothers friends has came out as gay to his mother who didn't take things very well and began telling him it's a ""phase and this is jaaykidds brother who is making you think this."" 

So now because of this my brothers friend is getting a really hard time at home and my brother is no longer allowed to spend time with his best friend which has caused my brother to have anxiety and panic attacks over the stress as my brother has only been out himself a couple of months and has been very nervous about it. Bearing in mind this two guys are 18 and 19 years of age. 

Where does the teacher part come into this I hear you ask? 

Well. My brother's friend's mother happens to teach at my little sisters primary school and myself and my family really don't feel comfortable with this unacepting, bigoted, homophobic woman taking part in my sisters education.

We like it to be known to her that this hate from a public figure isn't acceptable. 

So how can we go about this? 

So far I have. 

* Contacting the school
* Contactign the council
* Contacting the local news papers. 

Any advice on this tricky situation would be helpful. ",gayrights
Homophobic or Just Lazy? - From The True North Times,,gayrights
Proud to call Houston my home! Equal Rights Ordinance was passed tonight!,,gayrights
Too brown to be heard: The Brunei brouhaha,,gayrights
Happy Harvey Milk Day!! His stamp is making its debut today!,,gayrights
Vote for Your Rights,,gayrights
Gay Life in Greece: Ανασκόπηση της Ελληνικής IDAHOT,,gayrights
"""Do not judge, and you will not be judged.""","This lady stood on the corner on mothers day to ""help point people in the right direction""... I am not a religious person by any means but I do know the bible was created by man and there are different versions of It, such as the old and new testament. In the new testament there are at least three passages that may refer to homosexual activity. 
Religious people are some of the ugliest people I have ever met. So judgmental and rude. The bible tells you to love one another and not to pass judgement so why are you doing it?",gayrights
First Openly Gay Athlete Drafted by the NFL,,gayrights
Michael Sam's big gay kiss will never be forgotten. That was the whole point,,gayrights
"Holy Bullies and Headless Monsters: Rep. Louie Gohmert attacks lgbts for not being weak, deluded pushovers",,gayrights
Christian Leaders Who Are Suing for Gay Marriage as a Religious Right,,gayrights
"gay babies and adoption, my colleagues view... oh dear!",,gayrights
"OMEGLE POLL : Should gay marriage be legal? RESULTS : Yes, 83 (83%). Nope, 17 (17%).",,gayrights
South Carolina town protests firing of lesbian police chief,,gayrights
"In the 80s, no one talked about having gay parents. I grew up knowing I had to keep this part of my life a secret. Until now. Growing Up In Gayville explores, briefly, the experiences I had as a child and opens the door for other children of gay parents to step forward and claim their heritage.",,gayrights
Opposing Gay Marriage Doesn’t Make You a Crypto-Racist,,gayrights
Kids React to Gay Marriage: http://youtu.be/8TJxnYgP6D8 there is how for humanity if only Politics were not on the way...,,gayrights
Boy Scout Troop Loses Charter Over Gay Leader,,gayrights
Lawyer who defended California gay marriage ban says views evolving after daughter comes out,,gayrights
Mayor Who Fired Lesbian Police Chief Caught On Tape In Homophobic Tirade,,gayrights
Awesome song that advocates for gay rights in a region of the world that is notorious for homophobia.,,gayrights
Tolerance,,gayrights
Mormon Church: Same-sex marriage and gay sex are still not OK,,gayrights
First gay weddings in the UK,,gayrights
Lesbian rights gone too far? St Agnes Hospital in Baltimore now refusing to hire male nurses and physicians for Women's Healthcare. Gay rights now 'special rights' in Maryland? Black physicians and nurses refused employment? State now investigating.,,gayrights
"Footage unseen for 40 years, John E. Fryer in a panel discussion in 1969. In 1972 he became Dr. Anonymous at the APA convention. His 1972 speech changed psychiatry's views on homosexuality and led to its de-listing it as a mental illness in the DSM.",,gayrights
Online Campaigns to Relocate the 2018 World Cup From Russia due to Anti-Gay laws ~ FIFA World Cup 2014 Online,,gayrights
Federal judge strikes down Michigan's gay marriage ban,,gayrights
More anti-gay bigotry: NYC preacher advocates stoning gays; Indiana bakery refuses to make wedding cake for same-sex couple : TrueAtheism,,gayrights
Today Everyone Is Irish – Including Gays.,,gayrights
I stand with Uganda’s LGBT community (Gay Rights are human rights),,gayrights
Conor Collins un-paints Vladimir Putin,,gayrights
"""How to spot a homosexual""","I stumbled across this on reddit :( It makes me so sad 

How to spot a homosexual: A step by step guide 
""Homosexuals are amongst us. Every day, they discreetly pollute the Good Lord's Earth with their filthy ways.""

[Baptist Church Forum](http://www.landoverbaptist.net/showthread.php?t=53674)
",gayrights
Kentucky Attorney General Jack Conway Stands Against ‘Discrimination’.,,gayrights
"I'm just really tired of this guy's backward, bigoted BS.",,gayrights
Arizona Mormon mom defends her gay son against the dodos in her state and church [Video],,gayrights
Anne Rice Shuts Down Christian Homophobia,,gayrights
Practice what you preach.,"Hey guys, I'm a straight supporter who's been getting really frustrated by some ridiculous comments recently due to the football player.

I've seen many people say this: ""I just don't feel that your sexuality should be broadcast. That's something that should be kept private.""

They usually start off the with a disclaimer like, ""I'm not homophobic, but..."", or, ""I don't really have a problem with gays, but...""

Okay, decent point, I guess. But then you do it too. Don't let anyone know of your heterosexuality. Don't broadcast it. In a heterosexual relationship? Never hug, kiss, hold hands with, etc. your heterosexual partner. Don't post pictures on Facebook or Instagram, don't put a relationship status on Facebook. Never make any comments on a member of the opposite sex that you think is attractive. Don't let anyone know that you're heterosexual. Keep it private. 

If you think that sexuality is something that shouldn't be broadcast, then don't broadcast yours. Makes sense, no?

This also reminds me of the, ""Gays flaunt their homosexuality, I have a problem with that, it's not like we flaunt our heterosexuality.""

WHAT?!

How many times to heterosexual couples post pictures of themselves on social media profiles? How many ""I love my boyfriend/girlfriend so much!"" status updates do you see? How many heterosexual couples do you see being romantic in public in broad daylight? How many ads targeted towards men use a sexy woman in a bikini? How many ads targeted towards women use a shirtless man with a six-pack? How many gay characters are there in movies or on TV (The only time is when the character's homosexuality is a main point of the story, like Brokeback Mountain. How many times is a character gay just because he/she happens to be gay for no real reason?) How many heterosexual love/sex scenes are in movies or on TV? Heterosexuality is broadcast fucking everywhere. You never see gay couples being romantic in public. You never see homosexuality in advertisements (unless it's two hot women in an ad targeted towards men). You never see homosexuality anywhere unless there's a point to it. ",gayrights
Will Today’s Closeted NFL Stars Let Michael Sam Be the First Out Player?,,gayrights
Google makes statement about Russian anti-gay law,,gayrights
Homosexual tolerance around the world,,gayrights
abort gayness and win the olympics,,gayrights
"Proud parents march in the New Year's Day celebration in Chinatown, Los Angeles. Progress! (OC-cross post with /gaybros)",,gayrights
[Serious] Question about the Grammy's last night,"Alright, I am coming here with hope to find open minds, and an opportunity for discussion and not just immediate down votes because you don't agree with what I am bringing to the table...

First off, let me start out by saying I am all for Gay Rights, and I find it absolutely RIDICULOUS that this is even a debate in America. It almost sickens me.

But, isn't one of the main arguments against gay marriage is that it degrades the institution of marriage? So, you're going to feed into it by taking 30 seconds to marry these couples (straight and gay) by Queen Latifah? 

I almost feel like, if you take more than just a quick glance at the situation, it almost seems crazy that this even happened. Like I said, I am all for gay rights, and not bashing in anyway (or at least I don't intend to) but what does this really say about it all?",gayrights
Brilliant + Funny Speech on Gay Marriage,,gayrights
[Video] New Zealand Politician Unleashes One Of The Best Gay Marriage Speeches On Record,,gayrights
What are the gay rights priorities for 2014?,"Boycotting Russian olympics? Gay marriage? Decriminilisation of homosexuality around the world?

I am interested to know what redditors think are realistic aims for the gay rights movement to achieve by the end of 2014",gayrights
Queen Finally Pardons the ‘Father of Computer Science’ Convicted For Homosexuality - Truthdig,,gayrights
[video] what upsets me about the religious right in America [regarding gay rights being denied still],,gayrights
The Rant: Gay Marriage,,gayrights
Letter to those people of the world to who this concerns,"Dear people of the world,
I am terribly concerned on the issue of the stubborn unacceptance of the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, Questioning, Intersex (One whose privates do not match male or female standards), Ally, and Asexual (One who has either no sexual interest  or only a sexual interest in their self),, (LGBTQIA) community.  I am one of them and  I write this because of the injustice about the fact that because of who we are we are deemed as subhuman.  I do not understand so much as why this is so and those who deem us as subhuman don’t stop to think that once upon a time in history your race, and or people; was deemed as subhuman; (i.e.  African Americans, Christians, Jews, Women, Rwandan Tutsis, Native Americans, and let us not forget the very people whose whole continent was where humanity originated from; Africans, among other people of the world).  But eventually these people got the rights they deserved in the first place.
	And so it is the time that humanity adds more people to the list of sub humans because they do things that are not natural or goes against everything that is written in every single religion that says that some god/goddess created man and woman.  Not man and man or woman and woman or man and man, and woman and woman.  So countries like those who worship Islam legally allows the murder or government sanctioned execution of those who commit homosexuality or are part of LGBTQIA community.  Or I could talk about how Russia its “crackdown against lesbian gay bisexual and transgendered people which essentially says that Russia legalizes violence against the LGBTQIA community especially gays.
 
	People who turn to religion to rationalize in their minds that they just bullied, beat up, or even killed that gay person or any person of the LGBTQIA community who engages in a relationship with a person of the same sex should not have turned to religion in the first place.  Religion condemns hate just as much as it condemns any type of sin.  In Christian gospel Jesus did not preach hate he preached love.  It is the same in Judaism; except it was not Jesus it was God since Judaism does not believe that the Messiah has come yet (i.e. Jesus Christ, the Messiah according to Christianity).  These monotheistic religions along with most world religions have this preaching of love in common.  They also state that it is not up to man to judge what man does but it is up to that religion’s deity to judge what man does.

Or I could turn towards home; America “The Land of Freedom”.  For America to be “The Land of Freedom” then it should quickly pass gay rights laws that protect, allow to marry, and etc. which it does not.  Why is congress and some state legislatures not allow gay marriage?  To please their religious needs and vendettas.  But what about religion being a separate entity from the state?  If it’s supposed to be separate from the federal and state government then the government should be able to meet the needs of all its citizens whether it upsets the religious  or not.  We should be allowed to marry whoever we want and wherever we want.  Not get married in one of 16 states and Washington, D.C. and come back to your home state that doesn’t allow gay marriage and not be legally recognized as a married couple.  That is just an extremely sad example of not being a country known for its freedom.



Sincerely, Love_Is_Everything
",gayrights
Oh the ignorance...,"Whilst at the store waiting in line to check out, I overheard two guys talking. I couldn't catch all of the conversation but I heard this little gem: ""The gays shouldn't be allowed to marry! If they are, your girlfriend could be married by a lesbian! An you wouldn't be able to do anything about it!""

Needless to say I was appalled. I stopped the young man and asked ""You really think that's what will happen? That gay people will just marry whomever they choose? Regardless of the other person's orientation and availability?"" His reply: ""Yeah exactly!""

I just shook my head and went to another line. I seriously felt brain cells dying...",gayrights
This is what im talking about!,,gayrights
Vladimir Putins Gay Adventures (Animated Parody),,gayrights
European Court of Justice on asylum for homosexuals in the EU. Good news.,,gayrights
My sociology class went outside to protest against an anti-gay preacher at my campus.,,gayrights
Why a Barilla Boycott won't Work in the United States,,gayrights
Protest Salvation Army's Discrimination Against Gays With Queer Dollars.,,gayrights
Holiday season approaching - how to handle Salvation Army bellringers?,"Hi there, first time posting here. I wanted to start a dialogue about this because it's something that really, truly bothers me during the holidays. I think a lot of us are conditioned to feel guilt or shame when passing by a bellringer - for myself, I was a bellringer in an elf suit when I was a teenager, for two or three seasons. 

Recently I found out what the Salvation Army really is and what they do with their money. It's outrageous that they proclaim to be a charity while instead exploiting the kindness of others to fund anti-gay lobbying. I'm going to find it very difficult to not lecture every bellringer I see this year - as I wish someone would have told me when I was a kid instead of making me a soldier for anti-gay legislation. 

I am a lifelong LGBTQIA ally and it hurts me to see people who are probably by no fault of their own, just trying to do charity work, helping what is inarguably an evil organization. 

Any thoughts, opinions, advice? ",gayrights
Juror Dismissed for Being Gay - Larry's List - Truthdig,,gayrights
Anyone else think that implementing a state-wide gay-to-straight program across Virginia public schools is a bad idea?,"Virginia has never been known as a very progressive forward thinking state, but as a Virginian I find this could have some negative consequences for the kids who are told they are not ""normal"" by Govenor Bob McDonnell's definition. Thoughts?",gayrights
Rainbow laces in Soccer to End Homophobia… Must Read.,,gayrights
Sexual orientation and gender identity now included in Madison's affirmative action ordinance,,gayrights
A Pastor Asks A Politician Why He Supports Gay Marriage. He Wasn't Prepared For His Reply.,,gayrights
Australia has an election this week. Here is our current Prime Minister on TV last night speaking out in support of marriage equality (cross-post from r/ainbow),,gayrights
"Saw this on my wall today, thought I would share it here",,gayrights
Russia Gets the L.A. Treatment - Larry's List - Truthdig,,gayrights
My cousin's book isn't being published because his co-author is gay. They could use some publicity.,,gayrights
About the slippery slope argument...,"Let me get this straight: I am not gay, but I 100% support gay rights. Denying people marriage to the people they love makes no sense.

Many people against gay rights say that this is a slippery slope: next it will be pedophiles, rapists, etc.

I think this is a bunch of crap.

However, what I don't understand is this: why isn't it a slippery slope? Both sides have their own claims, one saying it is, one saying it isn't.

Is there any kind of evidence to support or disprove this argument?",gayrights
Being gay is a choice or based on upbringing? You're wrong!,,gayrights
The arguments against gay equality. I take a close look.,,gayrights
Amsterdam Gay Parade right now,,gayrights
Davie Street Village gets first permanent rainbow crosswalk in Canada,,gayrights
Gay Bashing: What Would You Do? This is a really messed up society,,gayrights
Oregon Launches Campaign for Gay Marriage,,gayrights
"Post Six: George Takei - The Man, The Myth, The Legend and my new hero! Wanna know why? Read on and find out.",,gayrights
"England, Wales OK Gay Marriage - Truthdig",,gayrights
Pennsylvania is thinking about overturning the ban on gay marriage,,gayrights
I absolutely HATE the Fellow Big White Guy Wink....,"I'm a big white guy with Irish ancestors. When I cut my hair real short people regularly mistake me for a cop. At the moment I am working as a sous chef and line cook, which means crew cut, because I hate the damn hairnets.

Last night I step off the line in a quiet moment to grab a glass of water. My boss, another Big White Guy, is standing at the edge of the counter that separates the kitchen from the front. (Yeah, it's one of those places that were trendy for 15 minutes, with an open floor plan so you can see the kitchen.)

My boss nudges me and nods toward a table near the back. The couple at the table is progressing from long kiss to full-blown makeout. 

He laughs. ""At least they're not both guys,"" he says. ""I can deal with a guy and a gal.""

He smiles and me and winks. 

It's the Fellow Big White Guy Wink. I have seen it a million times since I achieved my adult height. Some small-minded jerk sees that my skin color and build matches his and assumes that I too am a racist/homophobe/reactionary/redneck or some combination of the above.

I am pissed but I say nothing. I need the job. I would be tempted to say he's a good boss ""besides that,"" but you know what? I just can't. That is too big to rate a ""besides"".

I do not pretend to share the burdens of those who are victims of discrimination - though try finding a good job when you're a Big White guy with a couple of tattoos and some gray in your hair, and maybe you will see that some of us are at least a little familiar with what y'all have been up against. 

I actually cried a little this week when DOMA went down. I felt like we were finally getting somewhere. 

It took a Fellow Big White Guy Wink to remind me: We got a long way to go yet.

Are you gay? Do you love someone who loves you? Please consider hugging that person for me today. This is one Big White Guy that wishes you the best. ",gayrights
First US green card approved to same sex couple two days after supreme court's ruling of DOMA,,gayrights
Moment of Joy,,gayrights
Kalliope (Kal·yō´·pā),,gayrights
"Justin Lee, author of Torn, and founder of the Gay Christian Network talks about what it means now that the Supreme Court has ruled against the Defense of Marriage Act.",,gayrights
Spreading The Message of Marriage Equality,,gayrights
Pretty much sums it up...,,gayrights
Never even thought of it like this... Just.. Wow.,,gayrights
"[Video] Regarding gay youth considering coming out of the closet. This isn't your usual ""It Gets Better"" video and it has to be said due to the dangers of coming out.",,gayrights
Vive La France! French President Signs Same-Sex Marriage Into Law,,gayrights
Macklemore – Same Love – 11 Facts about Gay Rights,,gayrights
"Just a picture of two amazing Women, married and starting a family together. The message here is clear.",,gayrights
I had to say something. I can't stand when people preach against gay rights.,,gayrights
"Father and son set out on a 1,800 bike ride from Idaho to Texas to protest BSA's ban on gays",,gayrights
It could happen to anyone,,gayrights
Jason Collins (NBA) Becomes First Openly Gay Professional Male Athlete In Major Sports. Mad Respect!,,gayrights
Gay Catholic School Teacher in Ohio Fights Firing,,gayrights
Homophobes- your argument is invalid.,"So, today I heard a few classmates saying that they ""hate gay people"". Right in front of me, (all of them know I have a wonderful, gay, sister.) so naturally, I was agrivated, and asked him what his deal was. He said; ""I don't believe it's okay, because god made women for men, and men for women. It's the way it should be."" So I looked over at his desk, then noticed his pen.
His pen said ""fine tip writing pen"" on it. So I replied with this- "" okay, if that's the way your mind works, read your pen. It CLEARLY states, that the manufacturer intended it to be a pen for writing purposes, hence the ""fine tip WRITING pen"". But did I not just see you drawing with it? See, the pen was made for writing, just like men were ""made for women"" as you previously stated. But you have no problem drawing with it. So if what you say is true, (in that women were made for men), shouldn't men be able to love men, and women be able to love women?""  I mean.. Come on!! We're a grade 8 class, of 13 and 14 year olds. Why can't we be mature enough to treat everyone equally? Because, homosexuals, are the same people they were, before they came out. They're all around us, and perfectly equal. Yet, people have the nerve to treat homosexual people differently. Just awful. Asdfghjkl. Sorry for the rant, but I just didn't know where else to put a rant about homophobia!! But I'm here, I'm pissed, and I hope that's okay... :)",gayrights
x-post from an ask.reddit. about how homosexuality is NOT a choice.,,gayrights
My Challenge to Gay Marriage Opponents,,gayrights
NZ MP's hilarious gay marriage speech,,gayrights
Anyone ever heard Faces In The Hall by Gym Class Heroes? Powerful song regarding homosexuality,,gayrights
A previous teacher of mine was fired for being gay...,"Read the story and show support for her below:

http://www.dispatch.com/content/stories/local/2013/04/17/backers-rally-for-fired-gay-teacher.html

http://www.change.org/petitions/bishop-watterson-high-school-reinstate-faculty-member-carla-hale

",gayrights
Amazing &amp; moving - New Zealand Parliament erupts in applause &amp; song as they pass marriage equality,,gayrights
Constitutional Convention Fallout.,,gayrights
Somewhere over the Crazy,,gayrights
"Hey Reddit! So I've been working on a blog recently, and here's my most recent post I thought r/GayRights would appreciate",,gayrights
Gay People are People too (Colbert Report),,gayrights
How I Got Over Homophobia,,gayrights
This is the type of ignorance there is in my area. From a local news report. Pennsylvania,,gayrights
Texas A&amp;M student senate passes 'Religious Funding Exemption Bill',,gayrights
Have You Ever Watched A More Brilliant Argument For Equal Rights?,,gayrights
"Did you hear the fabulous news that Magic Johnson's son is gay? Well, so did these douchebags.",,gayrights
Ally,,gayrights
ignorant minded southerner's view on gay marriage.,,gayrights
Which Celebs Tweet About #MarriageEquality,,gayrights
My thoughts on gay rights:,I think anyone against gay rights should be banned from watching lesbian porn.,gayrights
The REAL real reason redditors support gay marriage: Motherfucking Quiche,,gayrights
Ginsburg: DOMA gives gay couples 'skim milk marriage',,gayrights
Pay attention guys... take a seat... before you know it gay marriage will collapse society.,,gayrights
Homophobe-Phobia:  Homophobes are basically zombies,,gayrights
He's got 99 problems but homophobia ain't one. ,,gayrights
"Prediction: Supreme Court will strike down gay marriage bans, and it won't be close",,gayrights
We could take some lessons from this guy.,,gayrights
RED HAT / chris PECK,,gayrights
Supreme Court hears arguments on Prop 8,,gayrights
Got in an argument with a friend and hoped you guys could help me out.,"We had the typical old tired gay marriage argument.  I'm in favor of it, he's not.  

He kind of threw me for a loop when he asked how I felt about polygamy and asked that if gay people had the right to be married shouldn't polygamist be allowed to marry as many people as they want as well.  

Of course it doesn't change how I feel about gay marriage.  I'm not really sure how I feel about that.  I mean, I don't think the two are comparable really, but for the sake of argument...

Can you be for gay marriage but against polygamist getting married?  I feel like while gay marriage is gaining a lot of support, even some people that support gay marriage wouldn't support polygamy.  It seems like a tougher sell for lack of a better phrase.  

Hope you guys can give some insight, and if you know of a better sub to ask this same question, please let me know.",gayrights
Les Mis - Rewritten to Fight 4 Civil Rights,,gayrights
A friend of mine talks about the gay hate groups in Paris and the manifestations going on. Great watch. (02:40),,gayrights
It's the douchebag of the week :(,,gayrights
"Art Tells a Story: ""Kissing doesn't kill: greed and indifference do.""",,gayrights
"Starbucks CEO Schultz stands up for gays, tells shareholder to F off",,gayrights
Awesome Soldier,,gayrights
Gay teen fends off religious assault,,gayrights
What exactly are the benefits gays are denied because gay marriage is illegal?,"I'm a total supporter of gay rights, but recently got into an argument with my father and lost due to lack of information and sources. He said that getting a civil union will give them the exact same benefits as marriage, and that hundreds of companies give the same discounts and benefits to gay couples as they do married hetero couples. Then he suggested they have it better because of a certain tax that only applies to marriage and not civil unions. This all sounds rather fishy to me but I don't have the evidence to shoot this down. Any sources you can include are greatly appreciated. Thanks!

EDIT: Thanks alot really appreciate it!",gayrights
Sir Stirling Moss: I don't want a 'poofter' to play me in a movie,,gayrights
"American Western, a play looking at the issue of gays in the military, will be heading to the Dublin Gay Theatre Festival this Spring! Check out our Kickstarter!",,gayrights
snazzy website with statistics and citations on gay marriage for each state in the US,,gayrights
A teacher at my local Catholic High School was giving out extra credit to attend an anti-gay rally. She walked away with no punishment.,Title says it all. She should have been fired.,gayrights
Virginia Legislator Anti-LGBT Discrimination 'Doesn't Exist',,gayrights
What I say to people who say being gay is a choice.,"Anytime people tell me that homosexuality is a choice I ask them a simple question. ""Have you ever wondered what its like having sex with a man? I mean really fantasized about making sweet, sweet love to another guy. No? Neither have I because I'm not gay."" Usually shuts em up.",gayrights
"In Valentine vote, Illinois Senate approves gay marriage",,gayrights
Free Marriage Bill passed in Illinois,,gayrights
Maryland Middle School Promotes Ex-Gay Therapy To Students,,gayrights
Woman calls the Dallas Voice (the leading gay newspaper of Dallas Texas) with a story idea about how horrible gays are.,,gayrights
Soledad O’Brien shames Perkins for defending gay scout ban with homosexuality-pedophilia link | The Raw Story,,gayrights
Pentagon to extend certain benefits to same-sex spouses,,gayrights
In Response to a YMCA in Tyler Texas Not Allowing Gay Couples and Families to receive the same rights as straight couples and families when wanting membership,,gayrights
"Was reading SOTI comics and found this, thought you guys would enjoy...",,gayrights
Free Thinking Gay Atheist: How does homosexuality fit into a scientific world view?,,gayrights
I want to murder these people.,,gayrights
When I voted in this poll it was 60/40 in favor of legalizing same sex unions.  Please help strengthen this non-Alabama kind of result with your votes!,,gayrights
"Macklemore - Same Love. No freedom till we're equal, damn right, I support it.",,gayrights
Gay Women will marry us,,gayrights
Got goosebumps when I saw this from my two favorite lesbians.,,gayrights
Right-wing homophobes beat up topless pro-marriage equality protesters wearing habit-like bonnets.,,gayrights
The Nigerian Anti-Gay Bill Rears Its Ugly Head..Again,,gayrights
"remove all foreign aid to Uganda and impose sanctions if the ""Kill the Gays"" bill is passed by the legislature. | We the People: Your Voice in Our Government",,gayrights
Beautiful pro gay rights song ,,gayrights
Response to a job offer to redo a website that promotes gay marriage bans - just a small way to show my support,"Hi xxxxx,
Thanks for getting back to me, but I think I'm going to have to pass on this project.  

I didn't go through your website at first, only skimming for structure and style, but no so much the content.

After spending some time reading though the site I'm just not comfortable helping to promote, however ancillary, some of the goals and teachings of your organization.

I've worked with many faith-based groups in the past on a variety of projects. I have no problem lending my services to religious groups with goals that aim to help people in need.

I just can't support any organization that promotes prejudice of homosexuality and advocates bans on gay marriage. It just feels immoral to deny someone their civil and human rights on the basis of religious intolerance.
A government built on a  foundation of separation of church, and protection of inalienable rights (not sacred or religious rights) has no business denying those civil rights to anyone, regardless of race, creed, religion, or sexual identity. My only solace is that, just as the Civil Rights movement of the 60s abolished Jim Crow laws, this too shall pass and all citizens will be afforded the same protections and benefits under the law.

I'm sorry for the rant, but I hold these beliefs just as strongly as any religious beliefs to the contrary. It's just as important for me to stand up for what I believe is right.

I sincerely wish you the best and hope one day very soon we will all be able to accept and love of one another, regardless of our differences. 

King regards,
xxxxx",gayrights
Why don't the people who oppose gay rights see this?,,gayrights
Interactive Map of Gay Rights by US State,,gayrights
"So, I was writing an essay in Google docs... and this happened.","http://imgur.com/E20Ye

Stay awesome google.

(For those wondering, its a quote from Alison Bechdel's book Fun Home.)

If this is old news to everyone else, just ignore it, I haven't been on reddit in a while.",gayrights
"General election ballot to repeal ordinance  that protects gay, lesbian, bisexual and transgendered people from discrimination in Salina. Salina, Kansas",,gayrights
Dealing with Facebook homophobia without being nasty.,,gayrights
"Chris Kluwe, K-Vikings, Teaches Ignorant Politician “They Won’t Magically Turn You Into A Lustful Cockmonster” EPIC",,gayrights
Gay Marriage ,"Gay marriage has no affect on anyone else but the people that are saying “I do”. Although many believe that same-sex marriage it will ruin society and is not a good look, it has very little affect on how their lives turn out. While growing up, I have played sports with many gay people and the only time I have been affected by them is hearing how hard it is to grow up in a society where they are looked down upon and almost always have to hide from the world. I have never understood why it is legal to marry your second cousins in more US states than it is for you to marry someone who is the same sex. Many people say that liking someone of the same sex is unnatural, but in reality there is even homosexuality in the animal kingdom.
Most who opposes gay marriage believe it is a sin according to the Bible. I am not sure why we have decided to attack gay marriage the most when we commit so many other sins: adultery, gluttony, greed, envy, pride, wrath, sloth, lust, stealing, killing, and saying the Lords name in vain. Why is that we have decided that gay marriage is not allowed but people will cheat on their spouses, steal from their friends, kill their enemies, devour all they can, decide they are better than everyone else, and despise someone just because they may have a better house? If you are going to hate someone just because they are gay, you may need to think about how you are acting first. Does it seem right that you can do whatever you want, which may include greediness, without any repercussions but when someone else decides they can do what they want, which may involve gay marriage, that it is not right for them?  It may be that people believe that all gay people try to prove a point by going out in public and “flaunting” that they are with someone of the same sex. Even throughout my experiences I have only seen a handful of gay people really showing affection in public, but when they do it does not bother me any more than seeing a heterosexual couple displaying affection in public. Why are we able to dictate who someone should love? Who even has the right to tell us that we cannot love someone because of his or her sex? It is almost as if saying we cannot marry or love someone because of his or her skin color, which seems almost barbaric.  It does not seem right to take away that part of someone’s life, everyone deserves happiness in his or her life and if that means you end up with someone of the opposite sex or someone of the same sex then so be it. Speaking with someone who believes that gay marriage should be allowed told me “Two people should be able to have the same rights as any other set of two people. This country was founded on the ideals that all men were created equal”.
Although it might not happen overnight, hopefully everyone will eventually see that gay marriage is fine, that it does not affect anyone else and  they should probably mind their own business anyway. What gives anyone else the right to judge whom someone loves? 
",gayrights
"I'm a heterosexual male, this was in the local newspaper in Launceston, Australia today (27/8/12). This disgusted me, as it did others who voiced their opinion on Facebook. Her opinion is only local, I want it known worldwide.",,gayrights
[COMIC] I thought you guys deserved to see something great.,,gayrights
"i think that even if/when some homophobes / anti-gays acknowledge that ""acceptance"" doesn't create gay people any more than discrimination makes them go away, they won't care.  it doesn't matter to them.  they just want LGBT people to be oppressed and repressed.  out of sight, out of mind.",,gayrights
San Francisco's Harvey Milk Democratic Club now uses Score Voting for its endorsements.,,gayrights
Gay men as scout leaders? (Or even women?),Really hard to explain. Had a discussion with my potential father-in-law regarding this issue. Your thoughts? I don't see the problem.,gayrights
Whitebriar Bed and Breakfast of New Jersey serves up discrimination and hate on their Facebook page.,,gayrights
Thoughts from FB God,,gayrights
So I was wondering why people support gay marriage but not polygamy?,"As I was browsing /r/atheism the subject of gay rights and marriage often pops up, today I've realized that most people who support gay rights does not support polygamy. My argument for polygamy if you also support gay rights is that if you agree two responsible individuals who love each other regardless of sex should marry, then for 3 or more responsible individuals to marry for love should be okay to.

I've looked at this first: http://www.npr.org/2012/05/31/154064922/would-gay-marriage-lead-to-legal-polygamy",gayrights
Only if  there were more people like this.,,gayrights
My Friend Doug's Amazing letter to the Boy Scouts of America.  He's sending back his Eagle Scout Award in protest of their continued discrimination.  Please share it on Facebook!,,gayrights
Fuck Chick Fil A,,gayrights
How Chick-Fil-A's Social-Media Bungle Fueled a Gay-Rights Backlash - Forbes,,gayrights
Saw this at one of my local churches,,gayrights
This is my friend Ric.,,gayrights
I think Chuck Norris is a secret Bottom,,gayrights
I am a dog. I support same-sex marriage.,,gayrights
I wrote this in response to a state here in Australia repealing civil unions for homosexual couples. I can't fathom people who take pride in bigotry. ,,gayrights
An open letter to Mr and Mrs Curnow the newly-wed couple who recently delivered a petition opposing equal marriage rights for all to the UK Prime Minister.,,gayrights
"Article + Video: Newly married couple deliver anti-gay marriage petition to Prime Minister, UK.",,gayrights
One Mom Against One Million Moms,,gayrights
I hope he uses it to watch gay porn,,gayrights
He deleted his status right after,,gayrights
My response to anyone against equal rights for homosexuals,,gayrights
"Sorry if this doesn't fit in well enough here, but this happened to me last night. I can't handle the stupidity...",,gayrights
It may not be much. But please help removing this biggotry of facebook by reporting it as hate speech.,,gayrights
9-year-old 'stands strong' against anti-gay church,,gayrights
‎21 Anti-gay Republicans have been involved in scandals regarding sex with a member of the same sex since 2004,,gayrights
"Civil partnership, medieval style: In the days when same-sex marriage was a Christian rite  | Mail Online",,gayrights
Love this!,,gayrights
Prominent political figures who support same-sex marriage,,gayrights
How I feel about North Carolina passing Ammendment 1,,gayrights
Bix Beiderbecke - There Ain't No Sweet Man Worth The Salt Of My Tears 1929 ,,gayrights
"As a straight male, this made me cry my eyes out",,gayrights
Hey folks does anyone know where the vote in NC on gay rights might go.  My dad just made me fell sad.,"So I am not gay but I am for everyone having the same freedoms as me as limited as those may be, but my folks live in NC.  And when I asked him which way he was going to vote he said against your rights.  It made me real sad as most of his votes do so i was wondering if any of you knew where the grassroots efforts stood in that state.  I just forget how heartless people can be by deliberetly deciding to limit someone elses rights.  One more reason to not talk to them as much I guess.  Well let me know what you think",gayrights
"Live Q&amp;A on the washington post: ""Should low-risk gay men be allowed to donate blood?"" I nearly feel off my chair ...","Stumbled upon this while browsing. It really shocked me as I've never thought of it as an issue. And what's with it only being men? Lesbian women are okay when men are not, because...?

Should be noted that I'm European and being gay is generally completely accepted where I live.",gayrights
"(x/post from r/atheism) North Carolina will soon be voting on Amendment 1, which will put a constitutional ban on gay marriages.","We all know how wrong and dangerous it is for religion and politics to combine. I originally posted this to r/atheism because of the ridiculously bigoted remarks from fellow North Carolinians and their use of the bible in denying another human being rights. Please help spread the word about this amendment, even if you are not from this state it can still happen in your own. ",gayrights
A friends Facebook status on same sex marriage rights in Australia - Inspiring  ,,gayrights
I sent an e-mail to my MP regarding that CARE charity.  Here is my response,,gayrights
Petition - UK MPs should sever links with the Christian charity CARE which co-sponsored 'gay cure' event. 80% of the way there already. ,,gayrights
Which seems unnatural now?,,gayrights
what does being in a gay rights activism group involve?,"I was at the mall today and a guy from one of these groups came up to me asking if i believe in gay rights. I said yeah and he started trying to pressure me into signing up for their group. I feel very strongly about gay rights but I didn't really feel comfortable signing up for something like that on the spur of the moment, especially since i have no idea what they would expect me to do. (Still gave him 10 bucks towards the cause though.) I felt sorta bad for not signing up but I'm curious what being in a group like that would involve. Would I have to stand around trying to convince people to join? Or is there other things I could do instead? (I'm not good at nor do I enjoy trying to pressure people/strangers.) I'm guessing different groups are different but any general idea of what goes on in them?",gayrights
10 Pop Culture Breakthroughs for the Gay Community,,gayrights
Religion: The Antithesis of Homosexual Rights ,,gayrights
The irrational &amp; sinister campaign against gay marriage,,gayrights
George Takei is awsome and he makes telling homophobes what douchebags they are awsome.,,gayrights
"Like a fine wine, Daniel Radcliffe gets better with age.",,gayrights
NH bill would allow workers to refuse service to gay couples for religious reasons,,gayrights
Which one is Gay?,,gayrights
Using their elected power for our freedom? Doing it right!,,gayrights
"Take your ""No Way José"" back to Massachusetts!",,gayrights
International Transgender Day of Remembrance: remembering Vanesa Ledesma,,gayrights
The gay - Muslim nexus,,gayrights
Mugabe and the minorities: Backlash update,,gayrights
"A Sikh writer places LGBT rights in the tradition: ""We are all One""",,gayrights
"Chinese aid and influence, LGBT rights, and Africa",,gayrights
"Trans progress alerts: ID cards, reality shows, rabbis",,gayrights
"Fuck everything about this, I feel bad for this kid. Please sign this Reddit.",,gayrights
Groundbreaking inter-American support for LGBTI rights,,gayrights
Sex talk and Indian classes,,gayrights
My foot is possessed by a spirit lesbian,,gayrights
Gorge Takei is the best ,,gayrights
President Obama speaks at the 15th HRC Dinner,,gayrights
Homosexual couple attacked by request of pastor.  Pastor is one of the men's father.  Police refuse to allow the couple to press charges?! WTF?!,,gayrights
Is your coworker gay? Are you unsure? That could be hurting your productivity. ,,gayrights
"Same-sex marriage demo to take place in Dublin


",,gayrights
"Former Duke doctor injured; gay partner, child found dead",,gayrights
Victim-blaming LA Times article accuses murdered 14-year-old boy of inciting violence through his supposed flirting and effeminate behavior and dress,,gayrights
Slings and Arrows,,gayrights
New Yorkers for Constitutional Freedoms file lawsuit AGAINST gay marriage; declare it to be within their religious freedom to repress homosexual rights,,gayrights
Senator Franken humiliates Focus on the Family Rep. in DOMA talks.,,gayrights
"For some gay couples, fight goes on to marry — and stay in the US",,gayrights
Until there are equal laws for gay and straight couples I am following in the footsteps of these two and not getting married.,,gayrights
I have just been directed here from r/Atheism,"I didn't realise there was a gay rights subreddit.

I am a straight man myself but I have always fought strongly for gay rights so I am proud to show my face here and do my bit.",gayrights
"EUobserver / Czech sexuality tests not legal, EU commission says",,gayrights
"Memo to LDS HQ: Dropping your opposition to civil marriage equality would obliterate the raison d'être of Fred's campaign. Until then, it's game on.",,gayrights
Good Letter to Editor Re: Marriage Repeal in NH,,gayrights
"Family Council to spend $4.71 million to ""ignite"" gay marriage battle in Minnesota",,gayrights
Beyond Gay Marriage; a look at the mainstreaming of the Gay Movement ,,gayrights
Biden: Gay Marriage Inevitable in America - Truthdig,,gayrights
Obama’s ‘Evolving’ Position on Same-Sex Marriage - Truthdig,,gayrights
Alabama woman uses logic to expose bigotry &amp; hypocrisy (excellent opinion piece about gays in the military),,gayrights
Court Rules Gay Couples Can't Divorce in Texas,,gayrights
Reason Beats Hate in Prop. 8 Ruling - Bill Boyarsky's Columns - Truthdig,,gayrights
Federal Judge Says Gays Have a Right to Marry - Truthdig,,gayrights
Gay Marriage Goes Up for Argument in California - Truthdig,,gayrights
Press are more homophobic than the public,,gayrights
Activists petition DA demanding justice for gay man who was attacked,,gayrights
"""Don't Ask, Don't Tell"" in State of the Union? - Political Hotsheet - CBS News",,gayrights
"America, the Hypocrite",,gayrights
"Challengers of the same-sex marriage ban plan to call to the stand homosexual couples, experts on the history of sexual discrimination and marriage, and the architects of the ballot measure.",,gayrights
Joel Osteen blesses Houston's new (gay) mayor Annise Parker - Faith,"Is your head spinning at the idea that Rev. Joel Osteen, head of the largest evangelical church in the USA blessed the new, gay mayor as she holds hands with her partner? Does this change your view -- for or against -- Osteen? Faith &amp; Reason: A conversation about religion, spirituality &amp; ethics",gayrights
"Africa Report - Globalizing the Culture Wars: U.S. Conservatives, African Churches, &amp; Homophobia",,gayrights
D.C. Gay Marriage Bill Will Debut Tuesday,,gayrights
Vocabulary lesson: no homo,,gayrights
Project 'Gaydar': An MIT experiment raises new questions about online privacy ,,gayrights
Muslim world increasingly targeting gays,,gayrights
The Freudian Slip Of The Day,,gayrights
"Finally, Respect for Marriage - DOMA Repeal Introduced -- Sign the Petition To Support Gay Marriage.",,gayrights
Ben &amp; Jerry's Chubby Hubby is now Hubby Hubby in support of same-sex marriage,,gayrights
ACLU Counsel and Gay Rights Champion Found Dead In DC Park,,gayrights
Gay parenting legal!,,gayrights
What Happens to a Marriage Deferred?,,gayrights
The Reality of Marriage Inequality...,,gayrights
20 FANTASTIC ways to come out of the closet,,gayrights
Coming Out,,gayrights
Is gay the new black?,,gayrights
God of Nones - Homosexuality,,gayrights
Can I ask you people a question?,"First of all, no, I don't support gay marriage and adoption of children, not because of my religious views but for other reasons.

I respect gay couples, but why can't you show the same to the people who simply have a different opinion to your own?
Is it right to call us bigots?",gayrights
"*Historic* U.S. Dist. Judge grants order allowing OH gay couple, one of which is terminally ill, to be buried together as spouses, acknowledging their MD wedding license",,gayrights
"I wore my usual 4 sizes too small rainbow colored shirt with ""LBGT"" printed on it and tight leather black pants today and someone called me a fag. How do I cope with this tradegy?",,gayrights
My new favorite bumper sticker.,,gayrights
"Came across the question ""Why should I, a straight person, support gay marriage? Educate me ...""","Here is a very simple way to put it….

Take away the religion…. Take away your personal beliefs… And simply look at it this way: If a “straight” couple is allowed to make themselves miserable by joining in marriage – which also allows them benefits – Why should a “gay” couple be denied that misery? If a “straight” couple is even considered ‘married’ due to “common-law-marriage” after being together for so long, which then entitles them to the benefits of a truly married couple – why should a “gay” couple be denied that right? (Also side thought – people should really take into consideration the amount of stress that a same-sex couple deals with on a day by day basis in comparison to an opposite-sex couple… If the love these two people share are able to withstand that – that alone should give some people the understanding that they deserve equal rights just like the rest of us) 

I, myself, believe in marriage. But my beliefs are from the morals of the old days – not what society see’s today as a “normal relationship” or “normal marriage”. However, I’ve come across many people over the years that do not believe in it. Which is why my question is put the way it is…. For those that don’t believe in marriage – but understand that it is something that some still believe in; then why can’t both sets (straight / gay) partake and be entitled to the same rights?

Another example (Oh boy, I can only imagine the hell I’m going to catch for this)… To remove the rights from a “gay” couple is the exact same thing as taking rights away from someone because they are a different color from you. So, if for so many years people believed that someone of color was “the devil” or was a lesser life form than you; and over the years it’s become less racist in some areas; then why are “gays” being out-casted / tormented / killed / hated / rights ripped away?

If you don’t support marriage at all – then it would be expected for you to not support gay marriage.



-**TL;DR:** If a “straight” couple is allowed to join in marriage and enjoy benefits that come along with that as well as the misery – why should a “gay” couple not be entitled to the same? Also….. To take away someone’s rights because of the sex they happen to love is just as bad as when people went around enslaving others due to the color of skin. Have we not grown past the days of slavery?  The fact that I came from a both a mother AND father who are both attracted to the same sex - it has nothing to do with the fact that I believe ""gays"" should have the same rights and not be treated as slaves or animals; having their rights taken away. ",gayrights
College humor support gay marriage video :),,gayrights
How I feel about my Facebook friends who are against gay rights,,gayrights
Why?,Why do you support gay marriage but not polygamy? why do you believe siblings/family shouldn't be allowed to marry?,gayrights
"Attorney Threatens My Friend with Legal Charges for Being Gay, Calls Him Predator","I originally posted this insanity on FB earlier, and it's making its rounds.  The pic links are directly to the letter sent by the attorney.  I'd love it if his phones rang constantly for a few days.  His number is on the letterhead.  Original post follows:

I'm asking anyone willing to re-post this, which is something I never do. I'm hoping to convene The Court of Public Opinion. This letter references my good friend Chris, himself a dad, who is openly gay and who is referred to repeatedly in this letter as a child predator... strictly due to his orientation. It even references the filing of legal charges, apparently also because Chris is gay. Chris isn't a criminal. Homosexuality doesn't make him one. This is pure homophobia, it's completely defamatory, and I think attorney Paul C. Sullivan should answer a few questions. The minor in question, not that it matters, was visiting family. I guess the attorney is worried that he will catch The Gay or something.

Please re-post, anywhere and everywhere. Tag people. Email it, Tweet it. If you feel this is horribly wrong (which seems an understatement), please FEEL FREE TO DIRECT YOUR QUESTIONS AND CONCERNS TO THE ASSHAT ATTORNEY WHOSE LETTERHEAD IS IN THE PICS. Call him. Really. I'm sure he would be happy to explain. Please also visit the attorney's website, http://www.paulcsullivanpa.com/ , and click About Us. Pay particular attention to the fact that ""He has led both the Allegany County Mental Health Association and the Allegany County Mental Health Advisory Board."" Wow. 

http://tinypic.com/r/a4rg4x/6

http://tinypic.com/r/108g12r/6",gayrights
An Open Letter to the Girl I Pretended To Have a Crush On in Eighth Grade,,gayrights
'The Problem with Same-Sex Marriage.' AKA DAFUQ did I just watch?!,,gayrights
NoH8 at the Westboro Baptist Church,,gayrights
"Is the ""first dance"" to celebrate the first reading of the marriage equality bill a good idea?",,gayrights
Man who claimed he was beaten for being gay admits he made it all up after police receive video of him hitting HIS OWN head after back-flipping off a curb,,gayrights
Biblical support of anti gay rights,"There is an epidemic sweeping the nation, and although it's existed for centuries it has never risen to the magnitude or public visibility of modern day. Previous governments abided by the just laws sent down by sacred scripture and tradition that explicately said that homosexuals would ""spend eternity in a lake of sulfur for the heinous deeds"" (Ezekiel 20:14).  By legalizing gay marriage, America would be going back on the catholic platform on which it was built.  God created people with gay thoughts to be priests, because that way they don't get married and distracted by women. If gay marriage were legal, there would be less priests, and statistics have shown that less priests leads to more gang violence and extramarital relations (Gallop). 

Arguments against gay marriage don't have to exclusively come from religion-although every religion rejects it-, there is science that can show that gays get more stds because they don't use contraception since their partner cannot get pregnant. However, the pride movement forces people to believe that gay couples have the right to have a child, even though kids without a mother and father usually drop out of school and get worse jobs. Gay sex leaves no chance for procreation, and therefore goes against the intended purpose of sex. Gays should be able to vote as long as they do not show allegiance to group that supports other evil practices like abortion and ending the bush tax cuts. 
",gayrights
The Sheffield Star is accused of printing homophobic material. Email of editor at bottom.,,gayrights
Growing pains: More on British aid,,gayrights
Consequences of Gay Marriage,,gayrights
Scout leader ousted from troop after she was discovered to be a lesbian after 6 years service (x-post from WTF),,gayrights
So I am guessing most of you support NAMBLA too right?,,gayrights
The proven solution to rape,,gayrights
ASSHOLE PATRIARCHAL WHITE HETERO MALE(S) AT BIOLA UNIVERSITY,"Biola is a conservative Christian school in LA county that tends to exhibit and contribute to misogyny, patriarchy, domestic violence, female oppression, and a distinct dislike for all things that are not heterosexual, male, complementarianistic, and bible thumping. 

Over the last few years a revolution has sprung up from the students who are fed up of being told what to think and how to think it. They call themselves the Biola Queer Underground.

Earlier today that group was passing out fliers for an event they are having off campus to educate the students about gay people and how one can be gay AND a Christian. 

while doing so, in a peaceful fashion, knowing that campus safety really does not care about their presence anymore and lets them do what they like, they were approached by an misogynistic asshole. His name is Patrick Saia and he is the director of resident life. He condescendingly used his authority to try and intimidate the one female in the group, even going so far as to touch her in a patronizing way and telling her to ""please calm down"". He treated her and the rest of the group with great disrespect. (This guy's job is to train Residence Directors and Residence Assistants on how to be loving, caring, understanding and helpful to the students) 

He called campus safety, and had to beg them to come and ask them to leave. After three calls campus safety finally came and asked them to leave (reluctantly).

People like this are the reason that conservative Christianity is so harmful to the world. it's this same attitude that they are better than everyone and should have control and dominion over everything that leads to genocide, rape, murder, and oppression of people of every kind. 

his email is: partick.r.saia@biola.edu 
and patrick.r.saia@g.biola.edu

please join me and tell him how much of an asshole he is. 
 ",gayrights
